Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 13. Interlocal Cooperation of Governmental Units

§ 17-13-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Interlocal Cooperation Act of 1974.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-13-3.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate and to contract with other local governmental units on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby provide services and facilities in a manner pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-13-5.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following words shall be defined as herein provided unless the context requires otherwise:

“Local governmental unit” shall mean any county, any incorporated city, town or village, any school district, any utility district, any community college, any institution of higher learning, any municipal airport authority or regional airport authority in the state, any local tourism commission in the state or any public improvement district created under the Public Improvement District Act.

“Governing authority” shall mean the board of supervisors of any county, board of trustees of any school district or community college whether elective or appointive, the governing board of any city, town or village, the board of commissioners of a utility district, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the commissioners of a municipal airport authority or regional airport authority, the commission of a local tourism commission or the board of directors of any public improvement district created under the Public Improvement District Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 28; Laws, 2009, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-13-7.
Joint exercise of powers and responsibilities; agreements generally.

Any power, authority or responsibility exercised or capable of being exercised by a local governmental unit of this state may be exercised and carried out jointly with any other local governmental unit of this state, any state board, agency or commission and any public agency of the United States, to the extent that the laws of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.

No such power, authority and responsibility may be exercised under the provisions of this chapter which will have the effect of abolishing any office which is held by a person elected by the citizenry, without first an election being called to decide the question of the abolition of any such elected office.

No agreement made hereunder shall be entered into by any local governmental unit without the approval by resolution on the minutes of the governing authority of that local governmental unit.

Any two (2) or more local governmental units may enter into written contractual agreements with one another for joint or cooperative action to provide services and facilities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to the law controlling the participating local governmental units or agencies shall be necessary before any such agreement shall be in force.

No such power, authority and responsibility may be exercised under the provisions of this chapter by a local governmental unit which it would not have authority to exercise otherwise pursuant to the law controlling the local governmental unit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 421; Laws, 1979, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 333, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1986).

§ 17-13-9.
Specifications of agreements.

Any agreement made hereunder shall specify the following:

Its duration.

Its purpose or purposes.

The precise organization, composition, nature and powers of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby; the specific citation of statutory authority vested in each of the local governmental units which is to be a party to the agreement.

The manner of financing, staffing and supplying the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor; provided that the treasurer and/or disbursing officer of one (1) of the local governmental units shall be designated in the agreement to receive, disburse and account for all funds of the joint undertaking as a part of the duties of the officer or officers.

The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination or amendment of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination or amendment.

The provision for administration, through a joint board or other appropriate means, of the joint or cooperative undertaking in the event that the agreement does not or may not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a joint board, all local governmental units party to the agreement shall be represented.

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking in the event that the agreement does not or may not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking.

Any other necessary and proper matters.

Any municipality may enter into an agreement with a county under this chapter to provide that sales of property for the nonpayment of taxes levied or the nonpayment of special assessments as provided in Section 21-19-11 by such municipality shall be made by the county tax collector at the county courthouse in the same manner as provided by law for sales of like property for unpaid county taxes, and that redemptions of property sold for taxes or special assessments levied by such municipality shall be made through the chancery clerk of the county.

Municipalities having as a common border a road or street may enter into an agreement pursuant to this chapter for the provision of police protection and law enforcement within the right-of-way of the street or roadway. An interlocal agreement undertaken pursuant to this subsection shall make the following provisions concerning violations occurring within the area subject to the agreement:

Joint or several enforcement of all penal laws of the State of Mississippi which are misdemeanors made a violation of city ordinance by operation of the provisions of Section 21-13-19;

Prosecution in the municipal court of the municipality employing the officer who made the arrest or issued the citation; jurisdiction shall lie in either municipality, and no charge filed in either municipal court shall be dismissed because of improper venue or lack of jurisdiction asserted solely on the grounds that the violation did not actually occur in the jurisdiction in which it is being prosecuted if the violation occurred in either jurisdiction; and

Any actions reasonably necessary to provide police protection and law enforcement pursuant to the agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 17-13-11.
Approval and filing of agreements.

Every agreement made by a local governmental unit hereunder shall, prior to and as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the Attorney General of this state who shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of this state. No agreement may be considered that does not cite the specific authority under which each of the local governing units involved may exercise the powers necessary to fulfill the terms of the joint agreement. The Attorney General shall approve any such agreement submitted to him hereunder unless he shall find that it does not meet the conditions set forth herein and elsewhere in the laws of this state and shall detail in writing addressed to the governing bodies of the units concerned the specific respects in which the proposed agreement fails to meet the requirements of law.

Failure to disapprove an agreement submitted hereunder within sixty (60) days of its submission shall constitute approval thereof.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer, unit or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its being in force, be submitted to the state officer, unit or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or it as to all matters within his or its jurisdiction in the same manner and subject to the same requirements governing action of the attorney general pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Prior to its being in force, an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall be filed with the chancery clerk of each of the counties wherein a participating local governmental unit is located and with the Secretary of State. The chancery clerk and the Secretary of State shall preserve such agreements as public records and index and docket the same separate and apart from all other records in his office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 17-13-13.
Funds, goods and services.

The governing authority of any local governmental unit entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may incur bonded and floating indebtedness, including general obligation indebtedness as authorized by Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31 and Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-329 and may appropriate funds for the purpose and in the manner prescribed by law without regard to whether the activities and improvements authorized by Section 17-13-7 to be financed by such debt or appropriation are within or without the boundaries of the local governmental unit. Said governing authority may sell, lease, grant or otherwise supply goods and services to any other local governmental unit which is a party to said agreement or the administrative body or legal entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1981).

§ 17-13-15.
General limitation of authority.

All laws in regard to purchases, auditing, depositories and expenditures in general which limit the authority of the agreeing local governing units shall also apply to any joint body created by the agreement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-13-17.
Specific restriction of powers.

Any joint administrative body or legal entity created by agreement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall not have the power to levy taxes or incur debt. Such entity may not exercise any power, authority or responsibility except those powers, authorities and responsibilities specifically delegated to such joint administrative body or legal entity by the terms of the agreement made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 498, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).